Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-180.01
Minor misrepresenting age; unlawful.

No minor shall obtain, or attempt to obtain, alcoholic liquor by misrepresentation of age, or by any other method, in any tavern or other place where alcoholic liquor is sold.

Laws 1935, c. 116, § 38, p. 400;

Laws 1937, c. 125, § 1, p. 437;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 53-338;

Laws 1943, c. 121, § 1, p. 419;

R.S.1943, § 53-180;

Laws 1951, c. 174, § 1(2), p. 664.